Utah statutes.
17B-1-416.   Automatic annexation to a district providing fire protection,
paramedic, and emergency services or law enforcement service.
(1)  An area outside the boundaries of a local district that is annexed to a
municipality or added to a municipality by a boundary adjustment under Title
10, Chapter 2, Part 4, Annexation, is automatically annexed to the local
district if:
(a)  the local district provides:
(i)  fire protection, paramedic, and emergency services; or
(ii)  law enforcement service;
(b)  an election for the creation of the local district was not required
because of Subsection 17B-1-214(3)(c); and
(c)  before the municipal annexation or boundary adjustment, the entire
municipality that is annexing the area or adding the area by boundary
adjustment was included within the local district.
(2)  The effective date of an annexation under this section is governed by
Subsection 17B-1-414(3)(b).
